Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Sections 2 to  4 of this 2025 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 475C.005
to 475C.525.
SECTION 2. (1) At a trade show or similar temporary event registered with  the Oregon
Liquor and Cannabis Commission:
(a) A marijuana  producer that holds a license issued under ORS 475C.065, a marijuana
processor that holds a license issued under ORS 475C.085, a marijuana  wholesaler that holds
a license issued under ORS 475C.093 and a marijuana retailer that holds a license issued un-
der ORS 475C.097 may:
(A) Provide to another licensee or holder of a  permit issued under ORS 475C.273 samples
of marijuana items; and
(B) Receive from another licensee  samples of marijuana items as described in this para-
graph.
(b) Subject to ORS 475C.057, a marijuana  producer that holds a license issued under ORS
475C.065, a marijuana processor that holds a license issued under  ORS 475C.085, a marijuana
wholesaler that holds a license issued under ORS 475C.093 and a marijuana retailer that holds
a license issued under ORS 475C.097 may transfer marijuana items to, and receive marijuana
items from, another licensee.
(c)(A) A marijuana wholesaler that holds a license issued  under ORS 475C.093 may sell
at wholesale or transfer marijuana items to  a marijuana retailer that holds a license issued
under ORS 475C.097.
(B) A marijuana  retailer that holds a license issued under ORS 475C.097 may receive from
a marijuana wholesaler that holds a license issued under ORS 475C.093 marijuana  items sold
or transferred as described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(d) The holder of  a permit issued under ORS 475C.273 may receive from a marijuana
producer that holds a license issued under ORS 475C.065, a marijuana processor  that holds
a license issued under ORS  475C.085, a marijuana wholesaler that holds a license issued un-
der ORS 475C.093 and a marijuana retailer that holds a license issued  under ORS 475C.097
samples of marijuana items provided as described in this subsection.
(2) The commission may adopt rules to  carry out this section, including rules to establish
a registration system for temporary events.
Enrolled Senate Bill 558 (SB 558-A) Page 1
SECTION 3. (1) A  marijuana producer that holds a license issued under ORS 475C.065
may provide to the holder of  a permit issued under ORS 475C.273 who performs work for or
on behalf of the marijuana producer:
(a) Samples of immature marijuana plants produced by the marijuana producer; and
(b) Seeds of marijuana plants produced by the  marijuana producer or that the marijuana
producer intends to produce.
(2) The holder of a permit issued under ORS 475C.273 described in subsection (1) of this
section may receive from a marijuana producer that holds  a license issued under ORS
475C.065 the items described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3)(a) Samples provided under this section may not be  in excess of the amounts specified
in ORS 475C.337.
(b) Nothing in this section allows the holder of a permit  licensed under ORS 475C.273 to
possess immature marijuana plants or seeds of marijuana plants in  excess of the amounts
specified in ORS 475C.337.
(4) The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission may adopt rules to  carry out this sec-
tion, including rules to  require tracking of samples provided and received under this section.
The rules regarding tracking of samples may not impose requirements that are more re-
strictive than requirements for tracking samples provided to consumers.
SECTION 4.
(1) A marijuana producer that holds a  license issued under ORS 475C.065, a
marijuana processor that holds a license issued under ORS 475C.085, a  marijuana wholesaler
that holds a license issued under ORS 475C.093 and a marijuana retailer that holds a  license
issued under ORS 475C.097 may provide to the holder of a permit issued under  ORS 475C.273
who performs work for or  on behalf of the marijuana producer, marijuana processor,
marijuana wholesaler or marijuana retailer samples of at least:
(a) One gram of usable marijuana per harvest lot per strain per month;
(b) One gram of cannabinoid concentrates per production batch;
(c) One gram of cannabinoid extracts per production batch; and
(d) One unit of packaged cannabinoid products per production batch.
(2)(a) A licensee described in subsection (1) of this  section may provide samples in the
amounts described in subsection (1) of this section to  any other licensee described in sub-
section (1) of this section for the purpose  of the receiving licensee providing the samples to
holders of permits issued under ORS 475C.273 who perform work for or on  behalf of the re-
ceiving licensee. A licensee that provides samples to another licensee under this subsection
may provide samples  in an amount proportional to the number of permit holders to whom
the receiving licensee will provide the samples.
(b) A licensee described in subsection (1) of this section may:
(A) Receive from any other licensee described in subsection (1)  of this section samples
in the  proportional amounts described in paragraph (a) of this subsection for the purpose of
providing the samples to the holders of permits issued under ORS 475C.273 who perform work
for or on behalf of the receiving licensee; and
(B) Provide samples received under this subsection to the holders of permits issued under
ORS 475C.273 who perform work for or on behalf of the receiving licensee.
(3) The holder of a permit issued under ORS 475C.273 described in subsection (1) or  (2)
of this section may receive  from a licensee described in subsection (1) of this section or a
receiving licensee described in subsection (2) of this section the items described in subsection
(1) of this section.
(4) Nothing in this section allows  the holder of a permit issued under ORS 475C.273 to
possess the items described in  subsection (1) of this section in excess of the amounts de-
scribed in ORS 475C.337.
(5) The Oregon Liquor and  Cannabis Commission may adopt rules to carry out this sec-
tion, including rules to:
Enrolled Senate Bill 558 (SB 558-A) Page 2
(a) Require tracking of samples provided and received under this section.  The rules re-
garding tracking of samples may  not impose requirements that are more restrictive than
requirements for tracking samples provided to consumers.
(b) Ensure the samples described in this section are not provided to consumers.
(c) Allow a marijuana wholesaler that holds a license issued  under ORS 475C.093 to pro-
vide at least the amount of samples described in subsection (1) of this section to any  other
licensee described in subsection (1) of this section per originating licensee, as that term is
defined by the commission.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 475C.081 is amended to read:
475C.081. [(1) As used in this section, “commonly  owned” means, as further defined by the Oregon
Liquor and Cannabis Commission by rule, that a person included on an application  for a license under
ORS 475C.065 has an interest in or authority over the management of another entity for which a license
has been issued under ORS 475C.065. ]
[(2)] (1) A marijuana  producer that holds a license issued under ORS 475C.065 may deliver to
or receive from a marijuana processor that holds a license issued under ORS 475C.085:
(a) Cannabinoid  products, cannabinoid extracts and cannabinoid concentrates processed by the
marijuana processor from marijuana produced by the marijuana producer and that do not contain
marijuana produced by any other marijuana producer; and
(b) Marijuana produced by the marijuana producer that the marijuana processor  received from
the marijuana producer but that the marijuana processor did not process.
[(3) Two or more marijuana producers that hold licenses issued under ORS 475C.065  and are
commonly owned by the same person may deliver to and receive from one another marijuana and  us-
able marijuana.]
(2) A marijuana producer that holds a license  issued under ORS 475C.065 may transfer
or deliver to, or receive from, another marijuana producer that holds a license issued  under
ORS 475C.065 usable marijuana.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 475C.513 is amended to read:
475C.513. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 475C.205  or any other provision prohibiting the transporta-
tion of  marijuana items to or from a location for which a license has not been issued under ORS
475C.005 to  475C.525 or prohibiting the possession of marijuana items at a location for which a li-
cense has not been issued under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525, a licensee may transport marijuana
items to and exhibit marijuana items at a trade show, the Oregon State Fair or a similar event if:
(a) The marijuana items  are tracked using the system developed and maintained under ORS
475C.177;
(b) Except for  any marijuana items sold at wholesale or transferred pursuant to section
2 of this 2025 Act,  all of the  marijuana items are returned to a premises for which a license has
been issued under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 immediately after the conclusion of the event; and
(c) The licensee complies with any other  requirement imposed by the Oregon Liquor and
Cannabis Commission by rule or order for the purpose of ensuring the security of the  marijuana
items, for the purpose of  preventing minors from having access to the marijuana items or for any
other purpose deemed relevant by the commission.
(2) The commission shall adopt rules to implement this section.
SECTION 7.
(1) Sections 2 to 4 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 475C.081  and
475C.513 by sections 5 and 6 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission may take any  action before the opera-
tive date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the commission
to exercise,  on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of
the duties, functions and powers conferred on the commission by sections 2  to 4 of this 2025
Act and the amendments to ORS 475C.081 and 475C.513 by sections 5 and 6 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 8.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 558 (SB 558-A) Page 3
Passed by Senate April 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 558 (SB 558-A) Page 4